Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201579-2308
Grants; High School Equivalency Grant Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The State Department of Education shall provide for grants to any entity offering a high school equivalency program, which entity is not an institution. Grants pursuant to this section shall be awarded to applicants which meet the requirements of section 79-2304.

(2) The High School Equivalency Grant Fund is created. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer four hundred thousand dollars from the Job Training Cash Fund to the High School Equivalency Grant Fund to carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2015, LB382, § 2.
August 30, 2015
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.